Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [136A.247] PLANT-BASED FOODS PRODUCTION TRAINING PILOT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin The commissioner of higher education shall establish and administer a plant-based foods production training pilot program to award grants to secondary career and technical education programs and institutions of higher education for the purpose of offering instruction in plant-based food production. The commissioner must give priority to institutions that coordinate with local producers of plant-based foods. Grants may be used for costs, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) equipment required to produce plant-based foods; new text end new text begin (2) facility renovations to accommodate plant-based food production; and new text end new text begin (3) training faculty to teach the fundamentals of plant-based food production. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of higher education for the plant-based foods production training pilot program under Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.247. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end